Hawaii statutes.
[§245-61] Enforcement. (a)
Enforcement of this part shall be under the concurrent jurisdiction of the
attorney general, the prosecuting attorneys or deputy prosecuting attorneys of
the various counties, and the police departments of the various counties.

(b) In addition to any other remedy provided
by law, including enforcement as provided in subsection (a), any person may
bring an action for appropriate injunctive or other equitable relief for a
violation of this part and for damages sustained by the person, and, if the
judgment is for the plaintiff, the plaintiff shall be awarded a sum not less
than $1,000 or threefold damages by the plaintiff sustained, whichever sum is
the greater, and reasonable attorneys fees together with the costs of suit. [L
2000, c 201, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next